Hawaii statutes.
§10-15 Annual report. The board shall
prepare and make public their annual report which shall include an enumeration
of their activities, income, and expenditures during the year. The annual
report for the previous fiscal year shall be submitted to the governor and the
legislature ten days prior to the convening of each regular session of the
legislature. The board shall prepare and submit special reports as may be
required by the legislature. [L 1979, c 196, pt of §2; am L 1990, c 221, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next